Hawaii statutes.
§14-25 Duties of the governor. On or
before the day of the meeting of the electors the governor shall deliver to the
electors a list of the names of electors, and the governor shall perform any
other duties relating to the presidential electors which are required of the
governor by laws of the United States. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next